Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.715.020

Operation of schools.

(1) A school that is the subject of a state-tribal education compact must operate according to the terms of its compact executed in accordance with RCW 28A.715.010.

(2) Schools that are the subjects of state-tribal education compacts are exempt from all state statutes and rules applicable to school districts and school district boards of directors, except those statutes and rules made applicable under this chapter and in the state-tribal education compact executed under RCW 28A.715.010.

(3) Each school that is the subject of a state-tribal education compact must:

(a) Provide a curriculum and conduct an educational program that satisfies the requirements of RCW 28A.150.200 through 28A.150.240 and 28A.230.010 through 28A.230.195, unless an exemption for one or more of these requirements is expressly included within the state-tribal education compact;

(b) Employ certificated instructional staff as required in RCW 28A.410.010, however such schools may hire noncertificated instructional staff of unusual competence and in exceptional cases as specified in RCW 28A.150.203(7);

(c) Comply with the employee record check requirements in RCW 28A.400.303 and the mandatory termination and notification provisions of RCW 28A.400.320, 28A.400.330, 28A.405.470, and 28A.405.475;

(d) Comply with nondiscrimination laws;

(e) Adhere to generally accepted accounting principles and be subject to financial examinations and audits as determined by the state auditor, including annual audits for legal and fiscal compliance; and

(f) Be subject to and comply with legislation enacted after July 28, 2013, governing the operation and management of schools that are the subject of a state-tribal education compact.

(4) No such school may engage in any sectarian practices in its educational program, admissions or employment policies, or operations.

(5) Nothing in this chapter may limit or restrict any enrollment or school choice options otherwise available under this title.

[ 2024 c 206 s 2; 2013 c 242 s 3.]